District of Columbia statutes.
29-1009.01

Indemnification.

(a)

Indemnification of an individual who has incurred liability or is a party, or is threatened to be made a party, to litigation because of the performance of a duty to, or activity on behalf of, a limited cooperative association shall be governed by Chapter 3 of this title.

(b)

A limited cooperative association may purchase insurance on behalf of any individual against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual to the same extent, and subject to the same conditions, as provided by Chapter 3 of this title.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 901 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition

Editor's Notes